Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.030

Services to be provided without charge or for fee based on ability to pay.

A dispute resolution center established under this chapter shall provide dispute resolution services either without charge to the participants or for a fee which is based on the participant's ability to pay.

[ 1984 c 258 s 503.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.